Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1980
Regular and special meetings.

(a) If the time and place of a directors' meeting is fixed by the bylaws or the board, the meeting is a regular meeting. All other meetings are special meetings.

(b) A board of directors may hold regular or special meetings in or out of this state.

(c) Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, members of the board of directors may participate in a regular or special meeting of the board or conduct the meeting through the use of any means of communication by which all directors participating may simultaneously hear each other during the meeting. A director participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 80.